California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(3) Previous good standing of licensure in the State of California.

(h) Nothing contained in this section shall prohibit the board from disapproving any respiratory therapy school, nor from denying the applicant if the instruction, including modalities and advancements in technology, received by the applicant or the courses were not equivalent to that required by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 307, Sec. 33.   (SB 821)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

3741.

(a) During the period of any clinical training, respiratory care services may be rendered by a student enrolled in an approved respiratory care training program when these services are incidental to his or her course of study.

(b) A person engaged in a respiratory care training program as a student shall be identified only as a “student respiratory care practitioner.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 645, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

3742.

During the period of any clinical training, a student respiratory care practitioner shall be under the direct supervision of a person holding a valid, current, and unrestricted license issued under this chapter. “Under the direct supervision” means assigned to a respiratory care practitioner who is on duty and immediately available in the assigned patient care area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 799, Sec. 19.   (SB 1575)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Suspension, Revocation, and Reinstatement of Certificates [3750. - 3759.]

3750.

The board may order the denial, suspension, or revocation of, or the imposition of probationary conditions upon, a license issued under this chapter, for any of the following causes:

(a) Advertising in violation of Section 651 or Section 17500.

(b) Fraud in the procurement of any license under this chapter.

(c) Employing an unlicensed person who presents herself or himself as a licensed respiratory care practitioner when the employer knew or should have known the person was not licensed.

(d) Conviction of a crime that substantially
 relates to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a respiratory care practitioner. The record of conviction or a certified copy thereof shall be conclusive evidence of the conviction.

(e) Impersonating or acting as a proxy for an applicant in any examination given under this chapter.

(f) Negligence in his or her practice as a respiratory care practitioner.

(g) Conviction of a violation of this chapter or of Division 2 (commencing with Section 500), or violating, or attempting to violate, directly or indirectly, or assisting in or abetting the violation of, or conspiring to violate this chapter or Division 2 (commencing with Section 500).

(h) The
 aiding or abetting of any person to violate this chapter or any regulations duly adopted under this chapter.

(i) The aiding or abetting of any person to engage in the unlawful practice of respiratory care.

(j) The commission of any fraudulent, dishonest, or corrupt act that is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a respiratory care practitioner.

(k) Falsifying, or making grossly incorrect, grossly inconsistent, or unintelligible entries in any patient, hospital, or other record.

(l) Changing the prescription of a physician and surgeon, or falsifying verbal or written orders for treatment or a diagnostic regime received, whether or not
 that action resulted in actual patient harm.

(m) Denial, suspension, or revocation of any license to practice by another agency, state, or territory of the United States for any act or omission that would constitute grounds for the denial, suspension, or revocation of a license in this state.

(n) (1) Except for good cause, the knowing failure to protect patients by failing to follow infection control guidelines of the board, thereby risking transmission of bloodborne infectious diseases from licensee to patient, from patient to patient, and from patient to licensee. In administering this subdivision, the board shall consider referencing the standards, regulations, and guidelines of the State Department of
 Public Health developed pursuant to Section 1250.11 of the Health and Safety Code and the standards, regulations, and guidelines pursuant to the California Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1973 (Part 1 (commencing with Section 6300) of Division 5 of the Labor Code) for preventing the transmission of HIV, hepatitis B, and other bloodborne pathogens in health care settings. As necessary, the board shall consult with the California Medical Board, the Board of Podiatric Medicine, the Dental Board of California, the Board of Registered Nursing, and the Board of Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians, to encourage appropriate consistency in the implementation of this subdivision.

(2) The board shall seek to ensure that licensees are informed of the responsibility of licensees and others to follow
 infection control guidelines, and of the most recent scientifically recognized safeguards for minimizing the risk of transmission of bloodborne infectious diseases.

(o) Incompetence in his or her practice as a respiratory care practitioner.

(p) A pattern of substandard care or negligence in his or her practice as a respiratory care practitioner, or in any capacity as a health care worker, consultant, supervisor, manager or health facility owner, or as a party responsible for the care of another. 

(q) Providing false statements or information on any form provided by the board or to any person representing the board during an investigation, probation monitoring compliance check, or any other enforcement-related
 action when the individual knew or should have known the statements or information was false.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 253, Sec. 1.   (AB 923)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

3750.5.

In addition to any other grounds specified in this chapter, the board may deny, suspend, place on probation, or revoke the license of any applicant or licenseholder who has done any of the following:

(a) Obtained, possessed, used, or administered to himself or herself in violation of law, or furnished or administered to another, any controlled substances as defined in Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code, or any dangerous drug as defined in Article 2 (commencing with Section 4015) of Chapter 9, except as directed by a licensed physician and surgeon, dentist, podiatrist, or other authorized health care provider, or illegally possessed any associated
 paraphernalia.

(b) Used any controlled substance as defined in Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code, or any dangerous drug as defined in Article 2 (commencing with Section 4015) of Chapter 9 of this code, or alcoholic beverages, to an extent or in a manner dangerous or injurious to himself or herself, or to others, or that impaired his or her ability to conduct with safety the practice authorized by his or her license.

(c) Applied for employment or worked in any health care profession or environment while under the influence of alcohol.

(d) Been convicted of a criminal offense involving the consumption or self-administration of any of the substances described in subdivisions (a)
 and (b), or the possession of, or falsification of a record pertaining to, the substances described in subdivision (a), in which event the record of the conviction is conclusive evidence thereof.

(e) Been committed or confined by a court of competent jurisdiction for intemperate use of or addiction to the use of any of the substances described in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c), in which event the court order of commitment or confinement is prima facie evidence of that commitment or confinement.

(f) Falsified, or made grossly incorrect, grossly inconsistent, or unintelligible entries in any hospital, patient, or other record pertaining to the substances described in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 799, Sec. 21.   (SB 1575)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3750.51.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b), (c), and (e), any accusation filed against a licensee pursuant to Section 11503 of the Government Code shall be filed within three years from the date the board discovers the alleged act or omission that is the basis for disciplinary action, or within seven years from the date the alleged act or omission that is the basis for disciplinary action occurred, whichever occurs first.

(b) An accusation filed against a licensee pursuant to Section 11503 of the Government Code alleging the procurement of a license by fraud or misrepresentation is not subject to the limitations set forth in subdivision (a).

(c) The limitation provided for by subdivision (a) shall be tolled for the length of time required to obtain compliance when a report required to be filed by the licensee or registrant with the board pursuant to Article 11 (commencing with Section 800) of Chapter 1 is not filed in a timely fashion.

(d) If an alleged act or omission involves a minor, the seven-year limitations period provided for by subdivision (a) and the 10-year limitations period provided for by subdivision (e) shall be tolled until the minor reaches the age of majority.

(e) An accusation filed against a licensee pursuant to Section 11503 of the Government Code alleging sexual misconduct shall be filed within three years after the board discovers the act or omission alleged as the ground for disciplinary action, or within 10 years after the act or omission alleged as the ground for disciplinary action occurs, whichever occurs first.

(f) The limitations period provided by subdivision (a) shall be tolled during any period if material evidence necessary for prosecuting or determining whether a disciplinary action would be appropriate is unavailable to the board due to an ongoing criminal investigation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 617, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

3750.6.

Upon request, every holder of a pocket license shall produce for inspection the original pocket license issued by the board. A facsimile of the license is not sufficient for that purpose.

Upon request, every applicant issued a work permit shall produce for inspection the original permit issued by the board. A facsimile of the work permit is not sufficient for that purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 586, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

3751.

(a) A person whose license has been revoked, surrendered, or suspended, or placed on probation, may petition the board for reinstatement, modification, or termination of probation, provided the person has paid all outstanding fees, fines, and cost recovery in full, and monthly probation monitoring payments are current.

(b) A person petitioning for reinstatement of his or her license that has been revoked or surrendered for three or more years shall also meet the current education and examination requirements required for initial licensure.

(c) A petition may be filed only after a period of time has elapsed, but not less than the following minimum periods from the
 effective date of the decision ordering that disciplinary action:

(1) At least three years for reinstatement of a license that has been revoked or surrendered.

(2) At least two years for early termination of probation of three years or more.

(3) At least one year for modification of a condition, or reinstatement of a license revoked or surrendered for mental or physical illness, or termination of probation of less than three years.

(d) The petition shall state any facts as may be required by the board. The petition shall be accompanied by at least two verified recommendations from licensed health care practitioners who have personal knowledge of the professional activities of the petitioner since the disciplinary penalty was imposed. The board may
 accept or reject the petition.

(e) Written or oral argument may be provided by the petitioner or, at the request of the board, by the Attorney General. Unless the board or the petitioner requests the presentation of oral argument, the petition shall be considered and voted upon by mail. If the petitioner or the board requests the opportunity for oral argument, the petition shall be heard by the board or the board may assign the petition to an administrative law judge.

(f) Consideration shall be given to all activities of the petitioner since the disciplinary action was taken, the offense for which the petitioner was disciplined, the petitioner’s activities during the time the license was in good standing, and the petitioner’s rehabilitative efforts, general reputation for truth, and professional ability.

(g) The
 board may deny the petition for reinstatement, reinstate the license without terms and conditions, require an examination for the reinstatement, restoration, or modification of probation, or reinstate the license with terms and conditions as it deems necessary. Where a petition is heard by an administrative law judge, the administrative law judge shall render a proposed decision to the board denying the petition for reinstatement, reinstating the license without terms and conditions, requiring an examination for the reinstatement, or reinstating the license with terms and conditions as he or she deems necessary. The board may take any action with respect to the proposed decision and petition as it deems appropriate.

(h) No petition shall be considered under either of the following circumstances:

(1) If the petitioner is under sentence for any criminal offense including any period
 during which the petitioner is on court-imposed probation or parole.

(2) If an accusation or a petition to revoke probation is pending against the person.

(i) The board may deny without a hearing or argument any petition filed pursuant to this section within a period of three years from the effective date of the prior decision.

(j) Petitions for reinstatement shall include a processing fee equal to fees charged pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (h) of Section 3775. In addition, petitions for reinstatement that are granted shall include a fee equal to the fee charged pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 3775, before the license may be reinstated.

(k) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to alter Sections 822 and
 823.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 703, Sec. 27.   (SB 1491)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

3751.5.

Notwithstanding Section 489, a person whose application for licensure has been denied for cause may reapply to the board for licensure only after a period of three years has elapsed from the date of the denial.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1274, Sec. 19.5.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

3752.

A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere made to a charge of any offense which substantially relates to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a respiratory care practitioner is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this article. The board shall order the license suspended or revoked, or may decline to issue a license, when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing the person to withdraw his or her plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information, or indictment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1274, Sec. 19.7.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

3752.5.

For purposes of Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 475), and this chapter, a crime involving bodily injury or attempted bodily injury shall be considered a crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a respiratory care practitioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 839, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

3752.6.

For purposes of Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 475), and this chapter, a crime involving sexual misconduct or attempted sexual misconduct, whether or not with a patient, shall be considered a crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a respiratory care practitioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1289, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

3752.7.

Notwithstanding Section 3750, any proposed decision or decision issued under this chapter in accordance with the procedures set forth in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, that contains any finding of fact that the licensee or registrant engaged in any act of sexual contact, as defined in Section 729, with a patient, or has committed an act or been convicted of a sex offense as defined in Section 44010 of the Education Code, shall contain an order of revocation. The revocation shall not be stayed by the administrative law judge. For purposes of this section, the patient shall no longer be considered a patient of the respiratory care practitioner when the order for respiratory procedures is terminated, discontinued, or not renewed by the prescribing physician and surgeon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1274, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

3753.

The procedure in all matters and proceedings relating to the denial, suspension, or revocation of licenses under this chapter shall be governed by the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 654, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

3753.1.

(a) An administrative disciplinary decision imposing terms of probation may include, among other things, a requirement that the licensee-probationer pay the monetary costs associated with monitoring the probation. 

(b) The board shall not renew or reinstate the license of any licensee who has failed to pay all of the costs ordered under this section once a licensee has served his or her term of probation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1150, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

3753.5.

(a) In any order issued in resolution of a disciplinary proceeding before the board, the board or the administrative law judge may direct any practitioner or applicant found to have committed a violation or violations of law or any term and condition of board probation to pay to the board a sum not to exceed the costs of the investigation and prosecution of the case. A certified copy of the actual costs, or a good faith estimate of costs where actual costs are not available, signed by the official custodian of the record or his or her designated representative shall be prima facie evidence of the actual costs of the investigation and prosecution of the case.

(b) The costs shall be assessed by the administrative law judge and
 shall not be increased by the board; however, the costs may be imposed or increased by the board if it does not adopt the proposed decision of the case.

Where an order for recovery of costs is made and timely payment is not made as directed in the board’s decision the board may enforce the order for repayment in any appropriate court. This right of enforcement shall be in addition to any other rights the board may have as to any practitioner directed to pay costs.

(c) In any action for recovery of costs, proof of the board’s decision shall be conclusive proof of the validity of the order of payment and the terms for payment.

(d) (1) The board shall not renew or reinstate the license of any licensee who has failed to pay all of the costs ordered under this section.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the board may, in its discretion, conditionally renew, for a maximum of one year, the license of any licensee who demonstrates financial hardship, through documentation satisfactory to the board, and who enters into a formal agreement with the board to reimburse the board within that one-year period for those unpaid costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 308, Sec. 40.   (SB 819)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

3753.7.

For purposes of this chapter, costs of prosecution shall include attorney general or other prosecuting attorney fees, expert witness fees, and other administrative, filing, and service fees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1069, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

3754.

The board may deny an application for, or issue with terms and conditions, or suspend or revoke, or impose probationary conditions upon, a license in any decision made after a hearing, as provided in Section 3753.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1274, Sec. 21.5.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

3754.5.

The board shall initiate action against any licensee who obtains a license by fraud or misrepresentation. The board shall take action against any licensee whose license was issued by mistake.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1274, Sec. 21.7.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

3754.8.

The expiration, cancellation, forfeiture, or suspension of a license, practice privilege, or other authority to practice respiratory care by operation of law or by order or decision of the board or a court of law, the placement of a license on a retired status, or the voluntary surrender of the license by a licensee shall not deprive the board of jurisdiction to commence or proceed with any investigation of, or action or disciplinary proceeding against, the licensee, or to render a decision to suspend or revoke the license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 253, Sec. 2.   (AB 923)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

3755.

(a) The board may take action against a respiratory care practitioner who is charged with unprofessional conduct in administering, or attempting to administer, direct or indirect respiratory care in any care setting. Unprofessional conduct includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(1) Repeated acts of clearly administering directly or indirectly inappropriate respiratory care procedures, protocols, therapeutic regimens, or diagnostic testing or monitoring techniques.

(2) Any act of administering unsafe respiratory care procedures, protocols, therapeutic regimens, or diagnostic testing or
 monitoring techniques.

(3) Any act of abuse towards a patient.

(4) A violation of any provision of Section 3750.

(b) The board may determine unprofessional conduct involving any and all aspects of respiratory care performed by anyone licensed as a respiratory care practitioner.

(c) Any person who engages in repeated acts of unprofessional
 conduct shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment for a term not to exceed six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 253, Sec. 3.   (AB 923)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

3756.

(a) A respiratory care practitioner who provides respiratory care may be ordered to undergo a professional competency examination approved by the board if, after investigation and review by one or more respiratory care practitioner consultants of the board, there is reasonable cause to believe that the person providing respiratory care is unable or unwilling to practice respiratory care with reasonable skill and patient safety. Reasonable cause shall be determined by the board and may include, but shall not be limited to, the following:

(1) Negligence.

(2) A pattern of inappropriate direct or indirect administration of respiratory care protocols, procedures, therapeutic regimens, or diagnostic testing of monitoring techniques.

(3) An act of incompetence or negligence causing death or serious bodily injury.

(4) A pattern of substandard care.

(5) Violation of any provision of this chapter.

(b) The matter shall be presented by the board’s executive officer or designee by way of a written petition detailing the reasonable cause. The petition shall contain all conclusions and facts upon which the presumption of reasonable cause is based. A copy of the petition shall be served on the person who shall have 45 days after receipt of the copy of the petition to file written opposition to the petition. Service of the petition and any order shall be in accordance with the methods of service authorized by subdivision (c) of Section 11505 of the Government Code.

(c) The board shall review the petition and any written opposition from the person who has charges brought against him or her, or the board may hold a hearing in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act to determine if reasonable cause exists, as specified in subdivision (a). The person who has charges brought against him or her shall have the right to be represented at that hearing by a person of his or her choice. If the board is satisfied that reasonable cause exists that is considered by the board as unprofessional conduct, the board shall issue an order compelling the person who has charges brought against him or her to undergo an examination of professional competency, as measured by community standards. For purposes of this section, “community standards” means the statewide standards of the community of licensees. Failure to comply with the order duly served the person charged shall constitute unprofessional conduct for purposes of disciplinary proceedings and failure to pass the examination shall result in denial, suspension, or revocation of the license, or registration which shall be determined by the board in its discretion.

(d) If the board proceeds pursuant to Sections 3755 and 3756 and the person charged passes the professional competency examination administered, the board shall be precluded from filing an accusation of incompetency based solely on the circumstances giving rise to the reasonable cause for the examination.

(e) If the board determines there is insufficient cause to file an accusation based on the examination results, then all agency records of the proceedings, including the petition and order for the examination, investigative reports, if any, reports of staff or the board’s consultants, and the reports of the examiners, shall be kept confidential and shall not be subject to discovery or subpoena.

(f) If no further proceedings are conducted to determine the person’s fitness to practice during a period of five years from the date of the petition under Section 3756, then the agency shall purge and destroy all records pertaining to the proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1274, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

3757.

The board may refuse to issue a license or an authorization to work as a “respiratory care practitioner applicant” whenever it appears that the applicant may be unable to practice his or her profession safely due to mental illness or chemical dependency. The procedures set forth in Article 12.5 (commencing with Section 820) of Chapter 1 shall apply to any denial of a license or authorization pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1274, Sec. 23.5.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

3758.

(a) Any employer of a respiratory care practitioner shall report to the Respiratory Care Board of California any leave, resignation, suspension, or termination for cause of any practitioner in their employ. The reporting required herein shall not act as a waiver of confidentiality of medical records. The information reported or disclosed shall be kept confidential except as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 800, and shall not be subject to discovery in civil cases.

(b) For purposes of the section, “leave, resignation, suspension, or termination for cause” is defined to mean any administrative leave, employee leave, resignation, suspension, or termination from employment for any of the following reasons:

(1) Suspected or actual use of controlled substances or alcohol to such an extent that it impairs the ability to safely practice respiratory care.

(2) Suspected or actual unlawful sale of controlled substances or other prescription items.

(3) Suspected or actual patient neglect, physical harm to a patient, or sexual contact with a patient.

(4) Suspected or actual falsification of medical records.

(5) Suspected or actual gross incompetence or negligence.

(6) Suspected or actual theft from patients, other employees, or the employer.

(c) An owner, director, partner,
 or manager of a registry or agency that places one or more respiratory care practitioners at any facility to practice respiratory care shall report to the Respiratory Care Board of California pursuant to subdivision (a) if either of the following apply:

(1) The owner, director, partner, or manager is aware that a respiratory care practitioner is no longer employed at the facility they were placed at by the registry or agency for any behavior described in subdivision (b).

(2) The owner, director, partner, or manager is asked to place the practitioner on a “do not call” list or other status indicating the facility does not want that practitioner placed at their facility for any behavior described in subdivision (b). 

(d) Failure of an employer to make a report required by this section is punishable by an administrative
 fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 624, Sec. 5.   (SB 1436)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

3758.5.

If a licensee has knowledge that another person may be in violation of, or has violated, any of the statutes or regulations administered by the board, the licensee shall report this information to the board in writing and shall cooperate with the board in furnishing information or assistance as may be required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 553, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

3758.6.

(a) In addition to the reporting required under Section 3758, an employer shall also report to the board the name, professional licensure type and number, and title of the person supervising the licensee who has been subject to leave, resignation, suspension, or termination for cause, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 3758. If the supervisor is a licensee under this chapter, the board shall investigate whether due care was exercised by that supervisor in accordance with this chapter. If the supervisor is a health professional, licensed by another licensing board under this division, the employer shall report the name of that supervisor and any and all information pertaining to the leave, resignation, suspension, or termination for cause of the person licensed under this chapter to
 the appropriate licensing board.

(b) The failure of an employer to make a report required by this section is punishable by an administrative fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 624, Sec. 6.   (SB 1436)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

3759.

Pursuant to Section 43.8 of the Civil Code, no person shall incur any civil penalty as a result of making any report required by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 553, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Offenses and Enforcement [3760. - 3769.3.]

3760.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, no person shall engage in the practice of respiratory care, respiratory therapy, or inhalation therapy. For purposes of this section, engaging in the practice of respiratory care includes, but is not limited to, representations by a person whether through verbal claim, sign, advertisement, letterhead, business card, or other representation that he or she is able to perform any respiratory care service, or performance of any respiratory care service.

(b) No person who is unlicensed or whose respiratory care practitioner license has been revoked or suspended, or whose license is not valid shall engage in the practice of respiratory care during the period of suspension or revocation, even though the person may continue to hold a certificate or registration issued by a private certifying entity.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, no person may represent himself or herself to be a respiratory care practitioner, a respiratory therapist, a respiratory care technician, or an inhalation therapist, or use the abbreviation or letters “R.C.P.,” “R.P.,” “R.T.,” or “I.T.,” or use any modifications or derivatives of those abbreviations or letters without a current and valid license issued under this chapter.

(d) No respiratory care practitioner applicant shall begin practice as a “respiratory care practitioner applicant” pursuant to Section 3739 until the applicant meets the applicable requirements of this chapter and obtains a valid work permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 586, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

3760.5.

The board shall share all complaints and information related to investigations involving a person licensed pursuant to Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 2840), including, but not limited to, data, findings, interviews, and evidence, with the Board of Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians of the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 624, Sec. 7.   (SB 1436)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

3761.

(a) No person may practice respiratory care or represent himself or herself to be a respiratory care practitioner in this state, without a valid license granted under this chapter, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

(b) No person or corporation shall knowingly employ a person who holds himself or herself out to be a respiratory care practitioner without a valid license granted under this chapter, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 586, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

3762.

Nothing in this chapter is intended to limit, preclude, or otherwise interfere with the practices of other licensed personnel in carrying out authorized and customary duties and functions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1274, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

3763.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding six months, or both, for each offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1274, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

3764.

Whenever any person has engaged or is about to engage in any acts or practices that constitute or will constitute an offense against this chapter, the superior court of any county, on application of the board, the Medical Board of California, or by 10 or more persons holding respiratory care practitioner licenses issued under this chapter, may issue an injunction or other appropriate order restraining that conduct. Proceedings under this section shall be governed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that no undertaking shall be required in any action commenced by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 279, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

3765.

This act does not prohibit any of the following activities:

(a) The performance of respiratory care that is an integral part of the program of study by students enrolled in approved respiratory therapy training programs.

(b) Self-care by the patient or the gratuitous care by a friend or member of the family who does not represent or hold themselves out to be a respiratory care practitioner licensed under the provisions of this chapter.

(c) The respiratory care practitioner from performing advances in the art and techniques of respiratory care learned through formal or specialized training.

(d) The performance of respiratory care in an emergency situation by paramedical personnel who have been formally trained in these modalities and are duly licensed under the provisions of an act pertaining to their specialty.

(e) Temporary performance, by other health care personnel, students, or groups, of respiratory care services, as identified and authorized by the board, in the event of an epidemic, pandemic, public disaster, or emergency.

(f) Persons from engaging in cardiopulmonary research.

(g) Formally trained licensees and staff of child day care facilities from administering to a child inhaled medication as defined in Section 1596.798 of the Health and Safety Code.

(h) The performance by a person employed by a home medical device
 retail facility or by a home health agency licensed by the State Department of Public Health of specific, limited, and basic respiratory care or respiratory care-related services that have been authorized by the board.

(i) The performance, by a vocational nurse licensed by the Board of Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians of the State of California who is employed by a home health agency licensed by the State Department of Public Health, of respiratory tasks and services identified by the board, if the licensed vocational nurse complies with the following:

(1) Before January 1, 2028, the licensed vocational nurse has completed patient-specific training satisfactory to their employer.

(2) On or after January 1, 2028, the licensed vocational nurse has completed patient-specific training by the employer in
 accordance with guidelines that shall be promulgated by the board no later than January 1, 2028, in collaboration with the Board of Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians of the State of California.

(j) The performance of respiratory care services identified by the board by a licensed vocational nurse who satisfies the requirements in paragraph (1) in the settings listed in paragraph (2).

(1) (A) The licensed vocational nurse is licensed pursuant to Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 2840).

(B) The licensed vocational nurse has completed patient-specific training satisfactory to their employer.

(C) The licensed vocational nurse holds a current and valid certification of competency for each respiratory task to be performed
 from the California Association of Medical Product Suppliers, the California Society for Respiratory Care, or another organization identified by the board.

(2) A licensed vocational nurse may perform the respiratory care services identified by the board pursuant to this subdivision in the following settings:
